Washington, session 2025-2026, SB6257.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:Sec. 1. RCW 18.140.280 and 2019 c 51 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:(1)(a) The director may issue an original registration as a state-registered trainee real estate appraiser, to be valid for a term not exceeding two years together with a maximum of two renewals, which must be completed within seven years from the original date of registration, unless either period is interrupted due to illness or other extenuating circumstances confirmed by a health care provider or provider, or by service in the armed forces of the United States of America. Only one of the renewals under this subsection may be issued if the trainee has failed to meet qualification standards necessary to take the written examination under RCW 18.140.100.(b) For the purposes of this section, "health care provider" or "provider" means:(i) A person regulated under this title, to practice health or health-related services or otherwise practicing health care services in this state consistent with state law; or(ii) An employee or agent of a person described in (b)(i) of this subsection, acting in the course and scope of his or her employment.(c) The department may create a form for confirmation from a health care provider or provider.(2) A trainee real estate appraiser may not provide appraisal services other than through and under the direct supervision of a state-certified general real estate appraiser or a state-certified residential real estate appraiser.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 2. Section 1 of this act takes effect May 1, 2027.--- END ---